Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2447.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.701 of Title 68, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "Broadband telecommunications service" means any
telecommunications service using broadband telecommunications
infrastructure for the purpose of offering high speed, switched,
broadband wireline or wireless terrestrial telecommunications
capability that enables users to originate and receive high-quality
voice, data, graphics, or video telecommunications through the
Internet, using any technology, and, concerning wireline broadband

Req. No. 11608 Page 1

tele communications service, having actual download speeds as defined
by the Rural Broadband Expansion Council;
2. "Qualified broadband telecommunications infrastructure"
means information equipment and facilities, information systems, and
information technology used for the purpose of providing broadband
telecommunications service; and
3. "Rural Broadband Expansion Council" means the entity created
pursuant to the provisions of Section 139.202 of Title 17 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
B. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, there
shall be allowed as a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to
Section 2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes in the amount of
twenty-five percent (25%) of the cost for qualified broadband
telecommunications infrastructure.
C. The tax credit authorized by this section may not be used to
reduce the tax liability of the taxpayer to less than zero.
D. To the extent not used, the credit authorized by this
section may be carried over, in order, to each of the five (5)
subsequent tax years.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective January 1, 2026.

60-1-11608 MAH 01/15/25


Req. No. 11608 Page 2